Illinois, session 104th, SB1687.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Employees Group Insurance Act of 1971 5is amended by changing Section 6.11 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 375/6.11)7    Sec. 6.11. Required health benefits; Illinois Insurance 8Code requirements. The program of health benefits shall 9provide the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 10covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 11Section 356t of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of 12health benefits shall provide the coverage required under 13Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 14356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 15356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 16356z.17, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 17356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.40b, 356z.41, 356z.45, 18356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 19356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 20356z.68, and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, 356z.76, and 21356z.77 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The program of health 22benefits must comply with Sections 155.22a, 155.37, 355b, 23356z.19, 370c, and 370c.1 and Article XXXIIB of the Illinois   SB1687- 2 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1Insurance Code. The program of health benefits shall provide 2the coverage required under Section 356m of the Illinois 3Insurance Code and, for the employees of the State Employee 4Group Insurance Program only, the coverage as also provided in 5Section 6.11B of this Act. The Department of Insurance shall 6enforce the requirements of this Section with respect to 7Sections 370c and 370c.1 of the Illinois Insurance Code; all 8other requirements of this Section shall be enforced by the 9Department of Central Management Services.10    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 11any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 12with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 13Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 14Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 15whatever reason, is unauthorized. 16(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 17102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 181-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-768, 19eff. 1-1-24; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 20102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 211-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-8, eff. 1-1-24; 103-84, 22eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 23103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 248-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 25eff. 8-2-24; 103-870, eff. 1-1-25; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 26103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-951, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff.   SB1687- 3 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b11-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 3Section 5-1069.3 as follows: 4    (55 ILCS 5/5-1069.3)5    Sec. 5-1069.3. Required health benefits. If a county, 6including a home rule county, is a self-insurer for purposes 7of providing health insurance coverage for its employees, the 8coverage shall include coverage for the post-mastectomy care 9benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 10health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 11under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 12356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 13356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 14356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 15356z.40, 356z.40b, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 16356z.48, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 17356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 18356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, and 356z.77 of the Illinois 19Insurance Code. The coverage shall comply with Sections 20155.22a, 355b, 356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance 21Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 22requirements of this Section. The requirement that health 23benefits be covered as provided in this Section is an 24exclusive power and function of the State and is a denial and   SB1687- 4 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1limitation under Article VII, Section 6, subsection (h) of the 2Illinois Constitution. A home rule county to which this 3Section applies must comply with every provision of this 4Section. 5    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 6any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 7with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 8Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 9Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 10whatever reason, is unauthorized. 11(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 12102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 131-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 14eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 15102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 161-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 17eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 18103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 197-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 20eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 21revised 11-26-24.) 22    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 23changing Section 10-4-2.3 as follows: 24    (65 ILCS 5/10-4-2.3)  SB1687- 5 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1    Sec. 10-4-2.3. Required health benefits. If a 2municipality, including a home rule municipality, is a 3self-insurer for purposes of providing health insurance 4coverage for its employees, the coverage shall include 5coverage for the post-mastectomy care benefits required to be 6covered by a policy of accident and health insurance under 7Section 356t and the coverage required under Sections 356g, 8356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 9356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 356z.11, 10356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 11356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 12356z.40b, 356z.41, 356z.45, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 13356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.60, 14356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, and 356z.70, and 15356z.71, 356z.74, and 356z.77 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 16The coverage shall comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, 17356z.19, and 370c of the Illinois Insurance Code. The 18Department of Insurance shall enforce the requirements of this 19Section. The requirement that health benefits be covered as 20provided in this is an exclusive power and function of the 21State and is a denial and limitation under Article VII, 22Section 6, subsection (h) of the Illinois Constitution. A home 23rule municipality to which this Section applies must comply 24with every provision of this Section. 25    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 26any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance   SB1687- 6 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 2Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 3Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 4whatever reason, is unauthorized. 5(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 6102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 71-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, 8eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 9102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 101-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 11eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 12103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 137-1-24; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, 14eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 15revised 11-26-24.) 16    Section 20. The School Code is amended by changing Section 1710-22.3f as follows: 18    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.3f)19    Sec. 10-22.3f. Required health benefits. Insurance 20protection and benefits for employees shall provide the 21post-mastectomy care benefits required to be covered by a 22policy of accident and health insurance under Section 356t and 23the coverage required under Sections 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 24356m, 356q, 356u, 356u.10, 356w, 356x, 356z.4, 356z.4a,   SB1687- 7 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 2356z.15, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.32, 3356z.33, 356z.36, 356z.40, 356z.40b, 356z.41, 356z.45, 4356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 5356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 6and 356z.70, and 356z.71, 356z.74, and 356z.77 of the Illinois 7Insurance Code. Insurance policies shall comply with Section 8356z.19 of the Illinois Insurance Code. The coverage shall 9comply with Sections 155.22a, 355b, and 370c of the Illinois 10Insurance Code. The Department of Insurance shall enforce the 11requirements of this Section. 12    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 13any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 14with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 15Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 16Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 17whatever reason, is unauthorized. 18(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-103, eff. 1-1-22; 19102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 201-1-22; 102-665, eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-804, 21eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 22102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 231-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, 24eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 103-535, eff. 8-11-23; 25103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-718, eff. 267-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918,   SB1687- 8 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 2    Section 25. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 3adding Section 356z.40b as follows: 4    (215 ILCS 5/356z.40b new)5    Sec. 356z.40b. Coverage for crib and car seat. A group or 6individual policy of accident and health insurance or a 7managed care plan that is amended, delivered, issued, or 8renewed on or after January 1, 2027 shall provide coverage for 9one crib and one car seat for each postpartum individual 10covered under the policy. The postpartum individual must be 11covered by the insurance policy at the time of the child's 12birth and must submit a claim within 6 months after the birth. 13The insurer must either reimburse the postpartum individual 14for the purchase of an approved crib and car seat upon 15submission of a valid receipt or provide a car seat and crib to 16the postpartum individual that complies with all federal and 17State safety standards. 18    Section 30. The Health Maintenance Organization Act is 19amended by changing Section 5-3 as follows: 20    (215 ILCS 125/5-3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2)21    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-808)22    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions.   SB1687- 9 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 2the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 3141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 4152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 5155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g.5-1, 6356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 356z.3a, 7356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 356z.10, 8356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 356z.18, 9356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 356z.25, 10356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 356z.33, 11356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 356z.40, 12356z.40a, 356z.40b, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 356z.46, 13356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 14356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 15356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 356z.68, 16356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 17356z.77, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 368a, 368b, 18368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 19408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) of 20subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 21XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 22Illinois Insurance Code.23    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 24for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 25Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 26are deemed to be "domestic companies":  SB1687- 10 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 2    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;3        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this 4    State; or5        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 6    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 7    of this State, except a corporation subject to 8    substantially the same requirements in its state of 9    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 10    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.11    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 12acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 13pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,14        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 15    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 16    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 17    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 18    acquisition of control takes effect;19        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 20    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 21    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 22    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 23    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 24    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 25    other acquisition of control;26        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the   SB1687- 11 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1    following information:2            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 3        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance 4        Organization sought to be acquired;5            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 6        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 7        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 8        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 9        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 10        forma financial statements reflecting projected 11        combined operation for a period of 2 years;12            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 13        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 14        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 15        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and16            (D) such other information as the Director shall 17        require.18    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 19Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 20any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 21enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 22maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 23to its health care certificates).24    (e) In considering any management contract or service 25agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 26Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria   SB1687- 12 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 2take into account the effect of the management contract or 3service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees 4and the financial condition of the health maintenance 5organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 6into account the effect of the management contract or service 7agreement on competition.8    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 9Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 10Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 11defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 12Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 13group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 14additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:15        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 16    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 17    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 18    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 19    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 20    not be less than one year); and21        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 22    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 23    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 24    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 25    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 26    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall   SB1687- 13 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 2    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 3    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be 4    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 5    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 6    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 7    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 8    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 9    plan years.10    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 11statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 12describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 13and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 14the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 15to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 16profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 17unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 18or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 19experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 20the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 21enrollment unit.22    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 23Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 24contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 25refund authorized under this Section.26    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045,   SB1687- 14 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 2accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 3Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint 4Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 5adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 6(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 7102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 81-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 9eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 10102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 111-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 12eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 13103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 146-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 15eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 16103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 171-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 18eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 19103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 201-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 9-26-24.) 21    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-808)22    Sec. 5-3. Insurance Code provisions. 23    (a) Health Maintenance Organizations shall be subject to 24the provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 25141.1, 141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151,   SB1687- 15 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1152, 153, 154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.22a, 2155.49, 352c, 355.2, 355.3, 355.6, 355b, 355c, 356f, 356g, 3356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356z.2, 4356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 5356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.17, 6356z.18, 356z.19, 356z.20, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.23, 356z.24, 7356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.28, 356z.29, 356z.30, 356z.31, 356z.32, 8356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 356z.36, 356z.37, 356z.38, 356z.39, 9356z.40, 356z.40a, 356z.40b, 356z.41, 356z.44, 356z.45, 10356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.48, 356z.49, 356z.50, 356z.51, 356z.53, 11356z.54, 356z.55, 356z.56, 356z.57, 356z.58, 356z.59, 356z.60, 12356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.63, 356z.64, 356z.65, 356z.66, 356z.67, 13356z.68, 356z.69, 356z.70, 356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.73, 356z.74, 14356z.75, 356z.77, 364, 364.01, 364.3, 367.2, 367.2-5, 367i, 15368a, 368b, 368c, 368d, 368e, 370c, 370c.1, 401, 401.1, 402, 16403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1, paragraph (c) 17of subsection (2) of Section 367, and Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, 18XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, XXVI, and XXXIIB of the 19Illinois Insurance Code.20    (b) For purposes of the Illinois Insurance Code, except 21for Sections 444 and 444.1 and Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, 22Health Maintenance Organizations in the following categories 23are deemed to be "domestic companies":24        (1) a corporation authorized under the Dental Service 25    Plan Act or the Voluntary Health Services Plans Act;26        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of this   SB1687- 16 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1    State; or2        (3) a corporation organized under the laws of another 3    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 4    of this State, except a corporation subject to 5    substantially the same requirements in its state of 6    organization as is a "domestic company" under Article VIII 7    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.8    (c) In considering the merger, consolidation, or other 9acquisition of control of a Health Maintenance Organization 10pursuant to Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code,11        (1) the Director shall give primary consideration to 12    the continuation of benefits to enrollees and the 13    financial conditions of the acquired Health Maintenance 14    Organization after the merger, consolidation, or other 15    acquisition of control takes effect;16        (2)(i) the criteria specified in subsection (1)(b) of 17    Section 131.8 of the Illinois Insurance Code shall not 18    apply and (ii) the Director, in making his determination 19    with respect to the merger, consolidation, or other 20    acquisition of control, need not take into account the 21    effect on competition of the merger, consolidation, or 22    other acquisition of control;23        (3) the Director shall have the power to require the 24    following information:25            (A) certification by an independent actuary of the 26        adequacy of the reserves of the Health Maintenance   SB1687- 17 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1        Organization sought to be acquired;2            (B) pro forma financial statements reflecting the 3        combined balance sheets of the acquiring company and 4        the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 5        acquired as of the end of the preceding year and as of 6        a date 90 days prior to the acquisition, as well as pro 7        forma financial statements reflecting projected 8        combined operation for a period of 2 years;9            (C) a pro forma business plan detailing an 10        acquiring party's plans with respect to the operation 11        of the Health Maintenance Organization sought to be 12        acquired for a period of not less than 3 years; and13            (D) such other information as the Director shall 14        require.15    (d) The provisions of Article VIII 1/2 of the Illinois 16Insurance Code and this Section 5-3 shall apply to the sale by 17any health maintenance organization of greater than 10% of its 18enrollee population (including, without limitation, the health 19maintenance organization's right, title, and interest in and 20to its health care certificates).21    (e) In considering any management contract or service 22agreement subject to Section 141.1 of the Illinois Insurance 23Code, the Director (i) shall, in addition to the criteria 24specified in Section 141.2 of the Illinois Insurance Code, 25take into account the effect of the management contract or 26service agreement on the continuation of benefits to enrollees   SB1687- 18 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1and the financial condition of the health maintenance 2organization to be managed or serviced, and (ii) need not take 3into account the effect of the management contract or service 4agreement on competition.5    (f) Except for small employer groups as defined in the 6Small Employer Rating, Renewability and Portability Health 7Insurance Act and except for medicare supplement policies as 8defined in Section 363 of the Illinois Insurance Code, a 9Health Maintenance Organization may by contract agree with a 10group or other enrollment unit to effect refunds or charge 11additional premiums under the following terms and conditions:12        (i) the amount of, and other terms and conditions with 13    respect to, the refund or additional premium are set forth 14    in the group or enrollment unit contract agreed in advance 15    of the period for which a refund is to be paid or 16    additional premium is to be charged (which period shall 17    not be less than one year); and18        (ii) the amount of the refund or additional premium 19    shall not exceed 20% of the Health Maintenance 20    Organization's profitable or unprofitable experience with 21    respect to the group or other enrollment unit for the 22    period (and, for purposes of a refund or additional 23    premium, the profitable or unprofitable experience shall 24    be calculated taking into account a pro rata share of the 25    Health Maintenance Organization's administrative and 26    marketing expenses, but shall not include any refund to be   SB1687- 19 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1    made or additional premium to be paid pursuant to this 2    subsection (f)). The Health Maintenance Organization and 3    the group or enrollment unit may agree that the profitable 4    or unprofitable experience may be calculated taking into 5    account the refund period and the immediately preceding 2 6    plan years.7    The Health Maintenance Organization shall include a 8statement in the evidence of coverage issued to each enrollee 9describing the possibility of a refund or additional premium, 10and upon request of any group or enrollment unit, provide to 11the group or enrollment unit a description of the method used 12to calculate (1) the Health Maintenance Organization's 13profitable experience with respect to the group or enrollment 14unit and the resulting refund to the group or enrollment unit 15or (2) the Health Maintenance Organization's unprofitable 16experience with respect to the group or enrollment unit and 17the resulting additional premium to be paid by the group or 18enrollment unit.19    In no event shall the Illinois Health Maintenance 20Organization Guaranty Association be liable to pay any 21contractual obligation of an insolvent organization to pay any 22refund authorized under this Section.23    (g) Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, 24if any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in 25accordance with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative 26Procedure Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint   SB1687- 20 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1Committee on Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so 2adopted, for whatever reason, is unauthorized. 3(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-34, eff. 6-25-21; 4102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-443, eff. 51-1-22; 102-589, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, 6eff. 10-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 7102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 81-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, 9eff. 1-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 10103-91, eff. 1-1-24; 103-123, eff. 1-1-24; 103-154, eff. 116-30-23; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 12eff. 1-1-24; 103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 13103-618, eff. 1-1-25; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 103-656, eff. 141-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, 15eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 16103-777, eff. 8-2-24; 103-808, eff. 1-1-26; 103-914, eff. 171-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 1811-26-24.) 19    Section 35. The Limited Health Service Organization Act is 20amended by changing Section 4003 as follows: 21    (215 ILCS 130/4003)  (from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3)22    Sec. 4003. Illinois Insurance Code provisions. Limited 23health service organizations shall be subject to the 24provisions of Sections 133, 134, 136, 137, 139, 140, 141.1,   SB1687- 21 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1141.2, 141.3, 143, 143.31, 143c, 147, 148, 149, 151, 152, 153, 2154, 154.5, 154.6, 154.7, 154.8, 155.04, 155.37, 155.49, 352c, 3355.2, 355.3, 355b, 355d, 356m, 356q, 356v, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 4356z.10, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 5356z.33, 356z.40b, 356z.41, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 6356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.57, 356z.59, 356z.61, 356z.64, 356z.67, 7356z.68, 356z.71, 356z.73, 356z.74, 356z.75, 364.3, 368a, 401, 8401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, 409, 412, 444, and 444.1 and 9Articles IIA, VIII 1/2, XII, XII 1/2, XIII, XIII 1/2, XXV, and 10XXVI of the Illinois Insurance Code. Nothing in this Section 11shall require a limited health care plan to cover any service 12that is not a limited health service. For purposes of the 13Illinois Insurance Code, except for Sections 444 and 444.1 and 14Articles XIII and XIII 1/2, limited health service 15organizations in the following categories are deemed to be 16domestic companies:17        (1) a corporation under the laws of this State; or18        (2) a corporation organized under the laws of another 19    state, 30% or more of the enrollees of which are residents 20    of this State, except a corporation subject to 21    substantially the same requirements in its state of 22    organization as is a domestic company under Article VIII 23    1/2 of the Illinois Insurance Code.24(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 25102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-731, eff. 261-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816,   SB1687- 22 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1eff. 1-1-23; 102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 2102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 31-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-426, eff. 8-4-23; 103-445, 4eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-649, eff. 1-1-25; 5103-656, eff. 1-1-25; 103-700, eff. 1-1-25; 103-718, eff. 67-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, 7eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 8    Section 40. The Voluntary Health Services Plans Act is 9amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 10    (215 ILCS 165/10)  (from Ch. 32, par. 604)11    Sec. 10. Application of Insurance Code provisions. Health 12services plan corporations and all persons interested therein 13or dealing therewith shall be subject to the provisions of 14Articles IIA and XII 1/2 and Sections 3.1, 133, 136, 139, 140, 15143, 143.31, 143c, 149, 155.22a, 155.37, 354, 355.2, 355.3, 16355b, 355d, 356g, 356g.5, 356g.5-1, 356m, 356q, 356r, 356t, 17356u, 356u.10, 356v, 356w, 356x, 356y, 356z.1, 356z.2, 18356z.3a, 356z.4, 356z.4a, 356z.5, 356z.6, 356z.8, 356z.9, 19356z.10, 356z.11, 356z.12, 356z.13, 356z.14, 356z.15, 356z.18, 20356z.19, 356z.21, 356z.22, 356z.25, 356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.30, 21356z.32, 356z.32a, 356z.33, 356z.40, 356z.40b, 356z.41, 22356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.54, 356z.56, 356z.57, 23356z.59, 356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.62, 356z.64, 356z.67, 356z.68, 24356z.71, 356z.72, 356z.74, 356z.75, 356z.77, 364.01, 364.3,   SB1687- 23 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1367.2, 368a, 401, 401.1, 402, 403, 403A, 408, 408.2, and 412, 2and paragraphs (7) and (15) of Section 367 of the Illinois 3Insurance Code.4    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1045, if 5any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 6with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 7Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 8Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 9whatever reason, is unauthorized. 10(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 11102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-665, eff. 1210-8-21; 102-731, eff. 1-1-23; 102-775, eff. 5-13-22; 102-804, 13eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 14102-860, eff. 1-1-23; 102-901, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1093, eff. 151-1-23; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, 16eff. 1-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-445, eff. 1-1-24; 17103-551, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-656, eff. 181-1-25; 103-718, eff. 7-19-24; 103-751, eff. 8-2-24; 103-753, 19eff. 8-2-24; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-832, eff. 1-1-25; 20103-914, eff. 1-1-25; 103-918, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 211-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 22    Section 45. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 23changing Section 5-16.8 as follows: 24    (305 ILCS 5/5-16.8)  SB1687- 24 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1    Sec. 5-16.8. Required health benefits. The medical 2assistance program shall (i) provide the post-mastectomy care 3benefits required to be covered by a policy of accident and 4health insurance under Section 356t and the coverage required 5under Sections 356g.5, 356q, 356u, 356w, 356x, 356z.6, 6356z.26, 356z.29, 356z.32, 356z.33, 356z.34, 356z.35, 7356z.40b, 356z.46, 356z.47, 356z.51, 356z.53, 356z.59, 8356z.60, 356z.61, 356z.64, and 356z.67, and 356z.71, and 9356z.75 of the Illinois Insurance Code, (ii) be subject to the 10provisions of Sections 356z.19, 356z.44, 356z.49, 364.01, 11370c, and 370c.1 of the Illinois Insurance Code, and (iii) be 12subject to the provisions of subsection (d-5) of Section 10 of 13the Network Adequacy and Transparency Act.14    The Department, by rule, shall adopt a model similar to 15the requirements of Section 356z.39 of the Illinois Insurance 16Code. 17    On and after July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce any 18rate of reimbursement for services or other payments or alter 19any methodologies authorized by this Code to reduce any rate 20of reimbursement for services or other payments in accordance 21with Section 5-5e. 22    To ensure full access to the benefits set forth in this 23Section, on and after January 1, 2016, the Department shall 24ensure that provider and hospital reimbursement for 25post-mastectomy care benefits required under this Section are 26no lower than the Medicare reimbursement rate.   SB1687- 25 -LRB104 08886 BAB 18941 b1(Source: P.A. 102-30, eff. 1-1-22; 102-144, eff. 1-1-22; 2102-203, eff. 1-1-22; 102-306, eff. 1-1-22; 102-530, eff. 31-1-22; 102-642, eff. 1-1-22; 102-804, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, 4eff. 5-13-22; 102-816, eff. 1-1-23; 102-1093, eff. 1-1-23; 5102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-84, eff. 1-1-24; 103-91, eff. 61-1-24; 103-420, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-703, 7eff. 1-1-25; 103-758, eff. 1-1-25; 103-1024, eff. 1-1-25; 8revised 11-26-24.) 9    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 10changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 11that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 12represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 13not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 14made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 15Public Act.